Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4515
Applicants; rights.

Long-term care insurance applicants shall have the right to return the policy or certificate within thirty days of its delivery and to have the premium refunded if, after examination of the policy or certificate, the applicant is not satisfied for any reason. Long-term care insurance policies and certificates shall have a notice prominently printed on the first page of the policy or certificate or attached thereto stating in substance that the applicant has the right to return the policy or certificate within thirty days of its delivery and to have the premium refunded if, after examination of the policy or certificate other than a certificate issued to a group as defined in subdivision (1) of section 44-4508, the applicant is not satisfied for any reason.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 15;

Laws 1989, LB 295, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 48.